Maine, session 132, LD1839.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12004-G, sub-§24-A is enacted to read:
24-A.
Labor Fundraising and Advisory Not Authorized 26 MRSA §1407
Commission to Support the
Hiring of Veterans
Sec. 2. 26 MRSA §1407 is enacted to read:
§1407. Promotion of hiring of veterans
1. Definition. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, "veteran"
has the same meaning as in section 877, subsection 3.
2. Advisory commission established. The Fundraising and Advisory Commission to
Support the Hiring of Veterans, established in Title 5, section 12004-G, subsection 24-A
and referred to in this section as "the advisory commission," is established to support a
program, referred to in this section as "the program," to help veterans and members of their
families find jobs, promote the hiring of veterans and members of their families by
employers in this State and provide information to veterans and members of their families
regarding the services to which they are entitled.
A. The advisory commission consists of the following members:
(1) The director of the program as a nonvoting member;
(2) An employee of the department, appointed by the commissioner;
(3) A representative of the Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency
Management, Maine Bureau of Veterans' Services, appointed by the Director of
the Maine Bureau of Veterans' Services;
(4) A representative of the Department of Corrections, appointed by the
Commissioner of Corrections;
(5) Two representatives of nonprofit veterans service groups, appointed by the
commissioner;
(6) Two representatives of private industry human resources personnel, appointed
by the commissioner;
(7) Two representatives of private workforce marketing agencies, appointed by
the commissioner; and
(8) Two public members, one appointed by the President of the Senate and one
appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
B. The advisory commission has the following duties:
(1) To establish a fundraising plan and raise money for the program;
(2) To solicit proposals for the marketing of the program. Proposals must be
included in the State's preferred vendor solicitation program whenever possible.
Members of the advisory commission are allowed to bid, but must recuse
Page 1 - 132LR1388(01)

319 themselves from discussions regarding decisions on that bid and votes on that bid;
420 and
(3) To oversee a separate web page to support the marketing efforts of the program
and a publicly accessible website managed by the department to provide
information about career fairs for veterans and members of their families and
veterans services provided by the department and to publicize donors to the fund
established in subsection 3.
3. Fund established. The Fund to Support the Hiring of Veterans, referred to in this
section as "the fund," is established. The fund consists of revenues received from
fundraising conducted by the advisory commission and any funds received as contributions
from private and public sources. The advisory commission shall administer the fund to
support the program, including, but not limited to, the approval of expenditures from the
fund to support the program. The fund must be held separate and apart from all other
money, funds and accounts. The fund is nonlapsing and investment earnings credited to
the assets of the fund become part of the assets of the fund.